New Jersey, session 222, S1038.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  It shall be a disorderly persons offense for a person, while congregating in a public place with other people who are also masked or disguised, to wear any mask or other facial obscurant or disguise with the purpose to conceal the persons identity while committing another crime or offense. A person shall not be charged with a disorderly persons offense, pursuant to this section, unless the person: (1) is charged with an underlying crime or offense under Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes; and (2) was wearing a mask at the time the person committed the underlying crime or offense. b.    This section shall not apply to: (1) activities related to the celebration of Halloween; (2) participants in any public parade or exhibition of an educational, religious, or historical character; (3)   persons wearing a mask, hood, or any device for protection from weather; (4)   persons wearing head coverings or veils in accordance with religious beliefs or customs; or (5) persons wearing a mask for medical purposes. c.    Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:1-8 or any other law, a conviction arising under subsection a. of this section shall not merge with a conviction of any other criminal offense, nor shall such other conviction merge with a conviction under subsection a. of this section. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.